pl: Profil dopasowania rękawic: Anatomiczny; Profilowany; Hybrydowy; Zwężany; Tradycyjny; Inny
nl: Handschoen pasvormprofiel: Anatomisch; Voorgevormd; Hybride; Toelopend; Traditioneel; Overig
tr: Eldiven kalıp yapısı: Anatomik; Konturlu; Hibrit; Daralan; Geleneksel; Diğer
fr: Profil d'ajustement du gant: Anatomique; Profilé; Hybride; Fuselé; Traditionnel; Autre
hu: Kesztyű illeszkedési profilja: Anatómiai; Kontúrozott; Hibrid; Szűkített; Hagyományos; Egyéb
pt-BR: Perfil de ajuste da luva: Anatômico; Contornado; Híbrido; Afunilado; Tradicional; Outro
da: Handskens pasformsprofil: Anatomisk; Konturformet; Hybrid; Tilspidset; Traditionel; Andet
el: Προφίλ εφαρμογής γαντιών: Ανατομική; Με καμπύλες; Υβριδική; Στενή; Παραδοσιακή; Άλλο
bg-BG: Профил на прилягане на ръкавицата: Анатомичен; Контурен; Хибриден; Стесняващ се; Традиционен; Друго
cs: Profil rukavice: Anatomický; Tvarovaný; Hybridní; Zúžený; Tradiční; Ostatní
de: Passformprofil des Handschuhs: Anatomisch; Konturiert; Hybrid; Konisch; Klassisch; Sonstige
sk-SK: Profil strihu rukavíc: Anatomický; Tvarovaný; Hybridný; Zúžený; Tradičný; Iné
lt-LT: Pirštinių pritaikymo profilis: Anatominis; Kontūrinis; Hibridinis; Siaurėjantis; Tradicinis; Kita
nb: Hansketilpasningsprofil: Anatomisk; Konturert; Hybrid; Avsmalnende; Tradisjonell; Annet
th: รูปทรงความกระชับของถุงมือ: ตามสรีระ; เข้ารูป; ไฮบริด; ทรงสอบ; ทรงดั้งเดิม; อื่นๆ
es: Perfil de calce del guante: Anatómico; Contorneado; Híbrido; Estrecho; Tradicional; Otro
ko: 장갑 핏 프로필: 해부학적; 컨투어; 하이브리드; 테이퍼드; 전통적인; 기타
pt-PT: perfil de ajuste da luva: Anatómico; Contornado; Híbrido; Cónico; Tradicional; Outro
sv: Passformsprofil för handske: Anatomisk; Formsydd; Hybrid; Avsmalnande; Traditionell; Övrigt
en: Glove fit profile: Anatomical; Contoured; Hybrid; Tapered; Traditional; Other
zh-TW: 手套貼合輪廓: 人體工學; 貼合; 混合; 錐形/窄版; 傳統版型; 其他
it: Profilo di vestibilità del guanto: Anatomico; Sagomato; Ibrido; Affusolato; Tradizionale; Altro
sl-SI: Profil prileganja rokavice: Anatomsko; Oblikovano; Hibridno; Zoženo; Tradicionalno; Drugo
ja: グローブのフィットプロファイル: アナトミカル; 立体裁断; ハイブリッド; テーパード; トラディショナル; その他
zh-CN: 手套贴合版型: 解剖学外形; 贴合轮廓; 混合式; 锥形; 传统款式; 其他
hr-HR: Profil pristajanja rukavice: Anatomski; Profilirani; Hibridni; Suženi; Tradicionalni; Ostalo
ru: Посадка перчатки: Анатомический; Контурный; Гибридный; Зауженный; Традиционный; Другой
ro-RO: Profilul de potrivire a mănușii: Anatomic; Conturat; Hibrid; Conic; Tradițional; Altele
fi: Hanskan istuvuusprofiili: Anatominen; Muotoiltu; Hybridi; Kapeneva; Perinteinen; Muu
vi: Hồ sơ độ vừa vặn của găng tay: Giải phẫu; Ôm sát; Lai; Thon nhọn; Truyền thống; Khác